Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Chapter 22 Wyoming Education Trust Fund

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

68 Am. Jur. 2d Schools §§ 99 to 133.

78 C.J.S. Schools and School Districts §§ 503 to 507.

§ 21-22-101.
Trust fund established; corpus inviolate; investment by state treasurer.

A fund is established which shall be referred to as the Wyoming education trust fund. The Wyoming education trust fund shall consist of those funds appropriated or designated to the fund by law or by gift from whatever source.

Funds deposited into the Wyoming education trust fund established pursuant to subsection (a) of this section are intended to be inviolate and constitute a permanent or perpetual trust fund which shall be invested by the state treasurer as authorized by law and in a manner to obtain the highest net return possible consistent with preservation of the corpus. Any earnings from investment of the corpus of the trust fund shall be credited by the state treasurer into a separate account and distributed in accordance with W.S.

21-22-102

.

Until the balance in the account established under subsection (a) of this section reaches fifty million dollars ($50,000,000.00), the governor shall annually recommend to the legislature specific revenue sources for a ten million dollar ($10,000,000.00) appropriation to that account.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 169, § 1; 1996, ch. 112, § 2; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2008, ch. 113, § 2; 2021 ch. 108, § 1, effective July 1, 2021; 2021 ch. 144, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a) deleted “An account within the trust and agency” preceding “fund” in the first sentence, and substituted “fund” for “account” in the second sentence; and in (b) deleted “within the general fund” following “separate account” in the final sentence.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “W.S. 9-4-715(a), (d) and (e)” for “W.S.

9-4-711

” in (b).

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 108, § 1, effective July 1, 2021, in the first sentence of (b), substituted "by law" for "under W.S. 9-4-715(a), (d) and (e)," added "net" following "highest" and substituted "earnings" for "interest earned" in the second sentence.

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 144, § 2, effective July 1, 2021, in the second sentence of (b), substituted "earnings" for "interest earned."

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 21-22-102.
Disposition of trust fund investment earnings.

Revenues deposited into the separate account established under W.S. 21-22-101(b) shall be distributed by the state treasurer as follows:

To the department of education for distribution in accordance with W.S.

21-22-106

and

21-22-107

to Wyoming school districts for programs benefiting school districts.

and (iii) Repealed by Laws 1997, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 505.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 169, § 1; 1997, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, §§ 503, 505; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2014 ch. 103, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a), substituted “separate account” for “separate general fund account.”

The 2014 amendment,

in (a)(i), substituted “W.S.

21-22-106

and” for “W.S.

21-22-103

through.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 21-22-103.
[Repealed.]

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 169, § 1; 1997, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 505; 2005, ch. 242, § 2; 2013 ch. 1, §§ 2, 3, effective January 29, 2013; repealed by 2014 ch. 103, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

Editor's notes. —

This section was derived from
Laws 1991, ch. 169, § 1, related to State advisory council for innovative education.

§ 21-22-104.
[Repealed.]

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 169, § 1; 1997, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, §§ 503, 505; repealed by 2014 ch. 103, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 21-22-105.
[Repealed.]

History:

Laws 1991, ch. 169, § 1; 1997, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 503; repealed by 2014 ch. 103, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 21-22-106.
Distribution of trust funds available to public schools; innovative program grants; criteria.

Revenues available to the department of education from the separate account under W.S.

21-22-102

shall be annually distributed to school districts as innovative program grants to fund programs providing innovation in or improvement to public education through the creation of new, different and improved educational opportunities in elementary or secondary schools, including:

Curriculum development activities such as initiatives in world languages, mathematics, social studies, English and the sciences, programs to develop critical or creative thinking, programs involving the private sector and programs providing parental and family training;

Operational initiatives such as modification to class schedules, school day, week, month or year calendar and scheduling of extracurricular activities;

Administrator and staff development and improvement programs such as performance incentives, awards for excellence, professional training and development programs and performance evaluation programs;

Acquisition of technological equipment for programs expanding curriculum, enriching student education, enhancing staff development and providing community service;

Applied science and technology programs designed to meet future labor market demands and to integrate public school programs with needs of business and industry;

Technical preparation programs integrating specific public school programs with community college programs and working with business and industry to prepare students for technical and academic careers;

Evaluation programs designed to determine the effect and achievement of innovative programs previously funded or currently provided within the district;

Regional developmental programs, including those designed to better prepare children for elementary school, and to improve parents’ skills in developing their children’s learning skills.

In addition to criteria specified under subsection (a) of this section, priority shall be given to those programs which supplement not supplant existing courses and curriculum, are easily transferred to or duplicated by other districts, provide matching funds from nonstate sources and demonstrate the ability of the recipient district to continue the program after expiration of innovative program grant monies.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 169, § 1; 1997, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 503; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2022 ch. 82, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a), substituted “separate account” for “separate general fund account.”

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, substituted “world” for “foreign” in (a)(i).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

National teacher certification program. —

Laws 2005, ch. 178, § 3, effective July 1, 2005, appropriates $182,000 from the school foundation program account to the department of education for school year 2005-2006 to supplement amounts available under § 21-22-106(a)(iii) to districts for reimbursements to teachers for actual costs of national certification fees as provided under §

21-7-501

. A charter school operating within the district pursuant to §§

21-3-301

through

21-3-314

and employing teachers otherwise qualifying under §

21-7-501

is entitled to reimbursements under this section. In addition and notwithstanding limits imposed under § 21-7-501(a), the department, in consultation with the Wyoming professional teaching standards board, is to expend the appropriated funds, together with any funds received from private sources, to: (1) increase recruitment of teacher applicants for national certification; (2) establish a support system for teachers while in the process of obtaining national certification; and (3) provide awards and public recognition for teachers receiving national certification. Not later than July 1, 2006, the department is to report expenditures of amounts appropriated under this section to the joint education interim committee, and recommend any necessary modification to the national certification program established by § 21-7-501.

§ 21-22-107.
Innovative program grants; application; selection by the state department of education; classification of districts; distribution; report on grants awarded; initial grants.

Proposals for innovative program grants authorized under W.S.

21-22-106

may be submitted annually by any Wyoming school district to the department of education on or before June 1. Submitted proposals shall be in a form provided and prescribed by the state department, which shall require the minimum information necessary to describe the proposal without unduly burdening the applicant, including target populations and objectives, compliance with criteria prescribed under W.S.

21-22-106

and proper grant expenditures including program budget and evaluation.

Each school district, either separately or in conjunction with another school district, shall be given the opportunity to submit a proposal for innovative program grants authorized under W.S.

21-22-106

at least once every five (5) years.

For the purposes of this section, school districts shall be annually classified based upon average daily membership for the previous school year, as follows:

Classification I, less than five hundred (500) average daily membership;

Classification II, five hundred (500) but less than one thousand (1,000) average daily membership;

Classification III, one thousand (1,000) but less than two thousand (2,000) average daily membership; and

Classification IV, two thousand (2,000) or greater average daily membership.

The state department shall award a grant authorized under this section to at least one (1) district from each classification pursuant to subsection (c) of this section. Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit the state department from awarding grants to more than one (1) district under each classification or more than one (1) grant to the same school district under criteria established under W.S.

21-22-106

.

Subject to available funding, the state department shall select those proposals it determines best fulfill criteria established under W.S.

21-22-106

and promote excellence in public education. The state department may use available funds to support innovative program evaluation projects and may contract with the University of Wyoming to conduct program evaluations.

The state department shall annually distribute funds to selected proposals on or before August 15. In no event shall grants awarded exceed funds available for this purpose within the separate account. Innovative program grants received under this subsection shall only be used for the purposes for which the grant is awarded and shall not be expended for any other program, activity or purpose.

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 102, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2014, ch. 103, § 2.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 169, § 1; 1997, ch. 31, § 2; 1997, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 503; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2014 ch. 103, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2014; 2019 ch. 102, § 2, effective February 26, 2019.

Effective Dates

Laws 2019, ch. 102 § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 26, 2019.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (f), substituted “separate account” for “special general fund account.”

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in the first sentence of (a), deleted “Except as provided for school year 1991-1992 under subsection (h) of this section” following “Proposals for innovative program”; in (d) and (e), substituted “state department” for “advisory council for innovative education”; in the first sentence of (f), deleted “In accordance with determinations of the advisory council” following “The state department”; in the first sentence of (g), deleted “on behalf of the advisory council” following “annually report”; and repealed former (h), which read: “The state superintendent shall coordinate and assist applicants and the advisory council to effectuate scheduling.”

The 2019 amendment,

repealed (g), which read: "The state department shall annually report to the governor and the joint appropriations interim committee and the joint education interim committee on selected proposals as well as all proposals submitted but not selected, and on the success and accomplishments of all programs funded by innovative program grants and evaluate the programs funded, and their impacts, according to state and national educational goals of excellence."

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§§ 21-22-108 and 21-22-109.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1997, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 505.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1991, ch. 169, § 1, pertained to the distribution of trust funds available, respectively, to community colleges and to the University of Wyoming.